finished/hil.foma
source canonicalize.foma


#dalagan	nagdalagan	V;PROG;PST 		(okay, need to check gina and na)

#istar	istar	    V;NFIN  (check; / is in the output, data error?)
#tudlo	magatudlo	V;FUT	(okay; a few errors, need to checkin)
#tudlo	nagatudlo	V;PRS	(okay; gina and na instead of naga)
#hular	naghular	V;PST	(okay; gina thing)


#desisyon	nagadesisyon pa	V;PRF+PROG;PRS
#pili	nagpili pa	V;PRF+PROG;PST
#basa	magabasa pa	V;PRF+PROG;FUT


#higda	naghigda na	V;PRF;PST 			(okay, gina thing )		
#agda	ginaagda na	V;PRF;PRS			(okay, gina thing )	
#tabo/katabo	matabo na	V;PRF;FUT 	(okay, gina thing )	

#tuon	magatuon	V;PROG;FUT 			(okay, paga maga)	
#yuhom	nagayuhom	V;PROG;PRS 			(okay, gina nag)


def Alphabet [% |%-|%/|a|b|d|e|g|h|i|k|l|m|n|o|p|r|s|t|u|w|y]; 
def Stem  Alphabet+;

def Grammar   ["[V]" "[PRF+PROG]" "[PRS]"]:{naga} Stem 0:{ pa}|
 			  ["[V]" "[PRF+PROG]" "[PST]"]:{nag} Stem 0:{ pa}|
 			  ["[V]" "[PRF+PROG]" "[FUT]"]:{maga} Stem 0:{ pa}|
			  ["[V]" "[PRS]"]:{naga} Stem | 
			  ["[V]" "[PST]"]:{nag} Stem |
			  ["[V]" "[FUT]"]:{maga} Stem |
			  ["[V]" "[NFIN]"]:0 Stem | 
			  ["[V]" "[PROG]" "[PST]"]:{nag} Stem |
			  ["[V]" "[PRF]" "[PST]"]:{nag} Stem 0:{ na} | 
			  ["[V]" "[PRF]" "[PRS]"]:{naga} Stem 0:{ na} | 
			  ["[V]" "[PRF]" "[FUT]"]:{maga} Stem 0:{ na} | 
			  ["[V]" "[PROG]" "[FUT]"]:{maga} Stem | 
			  ["[V]" "[PROG]" "[PRS]"]:{naga} Stem; 



def FixUpPrs {naga} -> {gina} || .#. _ [a g d a            | 
									    a k u              |
									    b a t o n 		   | 
									    b u k a            | 
									    b u k a s a n      | 
									    b u k s a n        |
									    d u m d o m        | 
									    k a l l i m t a n  | 
									    p a t a y          | 
									    s a b a t 		   |
									    s i r a  		   | 
									    s u l i t 		   | 
									    t a p o s          
									 ];  


def FixUpPrs2 {naga} -> {na} || .#. _ [d u l a 				| 
									   k i t a 				|
									   g u s t u h a n
									];  


# some / case to handle ...??? 
def FixUpFut {maga} -> {ma} || .#. _ [g u s t u h a n | 
									  k i t a 		  |
									  d u l a
									  ]; 


def FixUpFut2 {maga} -> {paga} || .#. _ [b u k a     | 
 										 b u k s a n
									   ]; 




def FixUpPst {nag} -> {gin} || .#. _ [a g d a                | 
									  b u k s a n 			 |
 									  b u k a 				 |
 									  b a t o n 		     | 
 									  d u m d o m  			 |
 									  d u l a 				 | 
 									  k a l l i m t a n      |
 									  p a t a y              |
 									  s u l i t              | 
 									  s a b a t              | 
 									  s i r a  				 |
 									  t a p o s              |  
 									  d a o g                |
 									  d u l a 				 |
 									  a k u  
 									  ];  


# def Cleanup "-" -> 0;

# extract only the 1st stem 
def cleanUp ?+ @-> 0 || "/" _ .#. .o. "/" -> 0; 

def final Grammar .o. FixUpPrs .o. FixUpPrs2 .o. FixUpFut .o. FixUpFut2 .o. FixUpPst .o. cleanUp; 

regex Canonicalize(final); 

save stack hil.fomabin

# foma -f hil.foma
# python evalfst.py -t hil | grep '\[V\]\[PRF+PROG\]\[PRS\]'
# grep "V;PRF+PROG;PRS" hil.trn | wc -l 


# python evalfst.py -t hil | grep '\[V\]\[PRS\]' 	| 	11 
# python evalfst.py -t hil | grep '\[V\]\[PST\]' 	| 	19
# python evalfst.py -t hil | grep '\[V\]\[FUT\]' 	|   7 


# python evalfst.py -t hil | grep '\[V\]\[PRF\]\[PRS\]' |  8 
# python evalfst.py -t hil | grep '\[V\]\[PRF\]\[PST\]' |  16 
# python evalfst.py -t hil | grep '\[V\]\[PRF\]\[FUT\]' |  10

# python evalfst.py -t hil | grep '\[V\]\[PRF+PROG\]\[PRS\]' |  10 
# python evalfst.py -t hil | grep '\[V\]\[PRF+PROG\]\[PST\]' | 	14
# python evalfst.py -t hil | grep '\[V\]\[PRF+PROG\]\[FUT\]' |  11 



# trianing: ACCURACY: hil 0.8311990686845169
# dev: ACCURACY: hil 0.75
